Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1504
Commissioner counties; no highway superintendent; county board or designee to perform duties.

In commissioner-type counties not having a county highway superintendent, the county board, or some other qualified person designated by the county board, shall assume and perform the powers and duties of the county highway superintendent.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. II, § 4, p. 515.